Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.365 and 2021 c 317 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person applying for a motor vehicle registration and paying the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (h), (j), (n), and (o) shall pay a motor vehicle weight fee in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law.(a) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due before July 1, 2016, the motor vehicle weight fee:(i) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight;(ii) Is the difference determined by subtracting the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350 from the license fee in Schedule B of RCW 46.17.355, plus two dollars; and(iii) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(b) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, the motor vehicle weight fee:(i) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight or type as follows:WEIGHTFEEMotorcycle, of any scale weight$ 15.004,000 pounds$ 25.006,000 pounds$ 45.008,000 pounds$ 65.0016,000 pounds and over$ 72.00;(ii) If the resultant motor vehicle scale weight is not listed in the table provided in (b)(i) of this subsection, must be increased to the next highest weight; and(iii) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415 unless prior to July 1, 2023, the actions described in (b)(iii)(A) or (B) of this subsection occur, in which case the portion of the revenue that is the result of the fee increased in this subsection must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395.(A) Any state agency files a notice of rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, absent explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015, for a rule regarding a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(B) Any state agency otherwise enacts, adopts, orders, or in any way implements a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard, without explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015.(C) Nothing in this subsection acknowledges, establishes, or creates legal authority for the department of ecology or any other state agency to enact, adopt, order, or in any way implement a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(2) A person applying for a motor home vehicle registration shall, in lieu of the motor vehicle weight fee required in subsection (1) of this section, pay a motor home vehicle weight fee of ((seventy-five dollars))$75 in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The motor home vehicle weight fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(3) Beginning July 1, 2022, in addition to the motor vehicle weight fee as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant to pay an additional weight fee of ((ten dollars))$10, which must be distributed to the multimodal transportation account under RCW 47.66.070 unless prior to July 1, 2023, the actions described in (a) or (b) of this subsection occur, in which case the portion of the revenue that is the result of the fee increased in this subsection must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395.(a) Any state agency files a notice of rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, absent explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015, for a rule regarding a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(b) Any state agency otherwise enacts, adopts, orders, or in any way implements a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard, without explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015.(c) Nothing in this subsection acknowledges, establishes, or creates legal authority for the department of ecology or any other state agency to enact, adopt, order, or in any way implement a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(4) The department shall:(a) Rely on motor vehicle empty scale weights provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine the weight of each motor vehicle; and(b) Adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights.--- END ---